Hawaii statutes.
§47-43 Payment to be made. If a lost,
stolen, destroyed or defaced bond, coupon or both, as the case may be, has
matured, has been called for redemption or is due, as the case may be, at the
time of request for replacement of such bond, coupon or both, as the case may
be, the director of finance may pay the face value of the matured bond or
coupon or the call price of the called bond, as the case may be. [L 1989, c 80,
pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next